Nebraska, session 109, LB1016.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1016 LB1016
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-901 Sections 68-901 to 68-9,111 and sections 2 to 6 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Medical Assistance Act.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislature finds that: (a) Health inequities
persist among American Indian and Alaska Native populations and other
underserved communities within the State of Nebraska; (b) culturally
grounded and community-based approaches to health care, including
traditional healing practices, have demonstrated value in supporting
physical, mental, emotional, and spiritual well-being; (c) section 1115
of the Social Security Act authorizes the Secretary of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services to approve experimental, pilot,
or demonstration projects that promote the objectives of the medicaid
program; and (d) meaningful consultation with tribal nations is required
under federal law and is essential to government-to-government
relationships and effective health policy.
(2) The purpose of sections 2 to 6 of this act is to authorize the
department to seek federal approval to test the reimbursement of
traditional healing services under the medical assistance program in a
manner that improves access to culturally appropriate care, advances
health equity, and complies with medicaid requirements.
Sec. 3. (1) No later than July 1, 2026, the department shall
develop and apply to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services for approval of a demonstration project waiver pursuant to
section 1115 of the Social Security Act to allow for reimbursement of
traditional healing services under the medical assistance program. If the
department has not submitted the demonstration project waiver application
by July 1, 2026, the department shall, on or before such date, submit a
report to the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature
stating the reasons for the delay, the status of consultation, and the
anticipated submission date.
-2-

LB1016 LB1016
2026 2026
(2) The demonstration project shall be designed to: (a) Improve
health outcomes and access to care for medicaid beneficiaries through
culturally appropriate services; (b) test the effectiveness of
traditional healing services as a complement to existing covered medicaid
services; (c) maintain budget neutrality and program integrity in
accordance with federal law and guidance; and (d) maximize available
federal financial participation, including enhanced federal matching
funds where available, consistent with federal law and guidance.
Sec. 4. (1) For purposes of sections 2 to 6 of this act,
traditional healing services means culturally grounded practices that
support health and well-being, as defined by the department in
consultation with tribal nations, tribal health authorities, and urban
Indian organizations as defined in 25 U.S.C. 1603, as such section
existed on January 1, 2026.
(2) Traditional healing services authorized under the demonstration
project shall: (a) Be voluntary for medicaid beneficiaries; (b) not
replace or restrict access to otherwise covered medicaid services; and
(c) be delivered by providers meeting eligibility criteria established by
the department and approved by the federal Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services.
Sec. 5. (1) The department shall engage in consultation with tribal
nations and urban Indian organizations as defined in 25 U.S.C. 1603, as
such section existed on January 1, 2026, prior to submission of the
demonstration project waiver application and throughout the
implementation and evaluation of the demonstration project.
(2) Consultation shall include, but not be limited to: (a)
Development of service definitions and provider eligibility criteria; (b)
design of reimbursement methodologies; (c) evaluation measures and
reporting requirements; and (d) confidentiality protections and
safeguards to ensure that participation does not require disclosure of
culturally protected or sacred knowledge consistent with applicable state
-3-

LB1016 LB1016
2026 2026
and federal law.
(3) Nothing in sections 2 to 6 of this act shall be construed to
waive tribal sovereignty, alter federal Indian health authorities, or
diminish the federal trust responsibility.
Sec. 6. (1) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to administer the demonstration project, subject to approval
by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including
provisions related to reimbursement, utilization controls, data
collection, and reporting.
(2) The department shall include an evaluation component as required
under section 1115 of the Social Security Act to assess the impact of the
demonstration project on health outcomes, access to care, utilization,
and cost effectiveness, and shall report findings as required by federal
law.
(3) Implementation of sections 2 to 6 of this act is contingent upon
approval of the demonstration project waiver by the federal Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services.
Sec. 7. Original section 68-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-